Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20269-501
Act, how cited.

Sections 9-501 to 9-513 shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Small Lottery and Raffle Act.

Laws 1986, LB 1027, § 159;

Laws 2000, LB 1086, § 19;

Laws 2026, LB1001, § 26.
July 1, 2026